Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1581
Execution; contents; satisfaction of damages and costs.

If the execution be for the delivery of the possession of real property, it shall require the officer to deliver the same, particularly describing the property, to the party entitled thereto, and may at the same time require the officer to satisfy any costs or damages recovered in the same judgment, out of the goods and chattels of the party against whom it was rendered, and for want of such goods and chattels, then out of the lands and tenements, and in this respect it shall be deemed an execution against the property.

R.S.1867, Code § 559, p. 491;

R.S.1913, § 8129;

C.S.1922, § 9065;

C.S.1929, § 20-1583;

R.S.1943, § 25-1581.